Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2447
Department of Motor Vehicles records; use and update of information.

(1) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall modify the existing system of the department to allow the status of a permit to carry a concealed handgun and the dates of issuance and expiration of such permit to be recorded on the permitholder's record provided for in section 60-483. The Nebraska State Patrol shall use the system to record the issuance or renewal of a permit to carry a concealed handgun. The transmission of notice of the issuance or renewal of such permit shall include the applicant's name, the applicant's motor vehicle operator's license number or state identification card number, and the dates of issuance and expiration of the permit to carry a concealed handgun.

(2) An abstract of a court record of every case in which a person's permit to carry a concealed handgun is revoked shall be transmitted to the Department of Motor Vehicles using the abstracting system provided for in section 60-497.01. Such abstract shall contain the name of the revoked permitholder, his or her motor vehicle operator's license number or state identification card number, and the date of revocation of the permit to carry a concealed handgun.

Laws 2006, LB 454, § 21.